New York, session 2025-2026, A11474.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 519 of the laws of 2024 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the city of Syracuse to impose a hotel 3 and motel tax, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to 5 contracts entered into on or after such date; provided, however, that 6 the provisions of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed December 7 31, [2026] 2029. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15971-01-6